Hawaii statutes.
§514E-23 Requirements for trustees. If
time share units are conveyed to a trustee pursuant to section 514E-19, the
following requirements shall be met:

(1) The trustee must be a bank, savings and loan
association, or a trust company meeting the requirements of any rules adopted
by the director pursuant to chapter 91.

(2) The trustee must at all times:

(A) Maintain fidelity bonds in a form
approved by the director in such amounts and providing coverage as required by
rules adopted by the director pursuant to chapter 91; and

(B) Maintain a policy of errors and omissions
insurance in a form approved by the director in such amounts and providing
coverage as required by rules adopted by the director pursuant to chapter 91.
[L 1982, c 186, §11]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next